tr: Simit şekli: Top; Lokmalık/nugget; Örgü; Düğüm; Parça; Pretzel dog; Halka; Çubuk; Yumuşak çörek; Çubuk; İnce/çıtır; Burgu; Tekerlek; Diğer
fr: Forme du bretzel: Boule; Bouchée/pépite; Tresse; Nœud; Morceau; Saucisse bretzel; Anneau; Bâtonnet; Petit pain moelleux; Bâtonnet; Fin/croustillant; Torsade; Roue; Autre
th: Shapesเพรทเซล: ทรงกลม; ชิ้นพอดีคำ/นักเก็ต; ทรงเปีย; ทรงปม; เป็นชิ้น; เพรทเซลฮอทดอก; ทรงแหวน; ทรงแท่งยาว; ขนมปังก้อนนุ่ม; ทรงแท่ง; แผ่นบาง/กรอบ; ทรงเกลียว; ทรงล้อ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblike preste: Kroglica; Grižljaj/kosec; Kita; Vozel; Kos; Hrenovka v presti (pretzel dog); Obroček; Palica; Mehka štručka; Palčka; Tanka/hrustljava; Zvita; Kolo; Drugo
it: Forma del pretzel: Pallina; Bocconcino/nugget; Treccia; Nodo; Pezzo; Pretzel dog; Anello; Bacchetta; Panino morbido; Bastoncino; Sottile/croccante; Spirale; Ruota; Altro
da: Kringleform: Kugle; Bid/nugget; Fletning; Knude; Stykke; Pretzel dog; Ring; Stang; Blød bolle; Pind; Tynd/sprød; Snoet; Hjul; Anden
cs: Tvar preclíku: Kulička; Kousek/nugeta; Pletenec; Uzel; Kousek; Párek v preclíku; Kroužek; Tyčka; Měkká bulka; Tyčinka; Tenký/křupavý; Zákrut; Kolečko; Ostatní
pt-PT: Forma do pretzel: Bola; Pedaço/nugget; Trança; Nó; Pedaço; Cachorro-quente em pretzel; Anel; Vareta; Pão macio; Palito; Fino/crocante; Laço; Roda; Outra
pt-BR: Pretzel formato: Bola; Petisco/nugget; Trança; Nó; Pedaço; Pretzel dog; Anel; Bastão; Pão macio; Palito; Fino/crocante; Torcido; Roda; Outro
pl: Kształt precla: Kulka; Kawałek; Warkocz; Węzeł; Kawałek; Precel z parówką; Kółko; Paluszek; Miękka bułka; Patyczek; Cienki/chrupiący; Świderek; Koło; Inny
nb: Saltkringleform: Kule; Munnfull/nugget; Flette; Knute; Bit; Pølse innbakt i pretzel; Ring; Stang; Mykt rundstykke; Pinne; Tynn/sprø; Twist; Hjul; Annet
ja: プレッツェルの形状: ボール; バイト/ナゲット; 三つ編み; ノット; ピース; プレッツェルドッグ; リング; ロッド; ソフトバンズ; スティック; 薄め/クリスプ; ツイスト; ホイール; その他
hr-HR: Pretzel oblik: Kuglica; Zalogaj/komadić; Pletenica; Čvor; Komad; Hrenovka u perecu; Prsten; Prutić; Mekano pecivo; Štapić; Tanko/hrskavo; Upleteno; Kotačić; Ostalo
vi: Hình dạng bánh quy xoắn: Hình tròn; Dạng viên; Hình bím tóc; Hình nút thắt; Dạng mẩu; Bánh xúc xích; Hình vòng; Dạng que dài; Bánh mì mềm; Dạng que; Mỏng/giòn; Hình xoắn; Hình bánh xe; Khác
fi: Suolatikun muoto: Pallo; Pala/nugetti; Palmikko; Solmu; Pala; Nakkipretzel; Rengas; Tanko; Pehmeä sämpylä; Tikku; Ohut/rapea; Kierre; Pyörä; Muu
en: Pretzel shape: Ball; Bite/nugget; Braid; Knot; Piece; Pretzel dog; Ring; Rod; Soft bun; Stick; Thin/crisp; Twist; Wheel; Other
sv: Kringelform: Boll; Munsbit/nugget; Fläta; Knut; Bit; Pretzel dog; Ring; Stav; Mjuk bulle; Pinne; Tunn/krispig; Twist; Hjul; Övrigt
hu: Perec alakja: Golyó; Falat / rög; Fonat; Csomó; Darab; Perecbe tekert virsli; Karika; Rúd; Puha zsemle; Pálcika; Vékony / ropogós; Csavart; Kerék; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма на геврека: Топче; Хапка/нъгет; Плитка; Възел; Парче; Кренвирш в брецел; Пръстен; Пръчица; Мека питка; Солета; Тънки/хрупкави; Спирала; Колело; Друго
zh-TW: 椒鹽脆餅形狀: 球狀; 塊狀; 辮子狀; 扭結狀; 片狀; 蝴蝶餅熱狗; 環狀; 棒狀; 軟包; 條狀; 薄片/脆片; 麻花狀; 車輪狀; 其他
ru: Форма кренделя: Шарик; Мини-порция / наггетс; Косичка; Узел; Кусочек; Претцель-дог; Кольцо; Толстая соломка; Мягкая булочка; Соломка; Тонкий / хрустящий; Завиток; Колесико; Другое
de: Brezelform: Kugel; Happen / Nugget; Zopf; Knoten; Stück; Pretzel Dog; Ring; Stange; Weiches Brötchen; Stäbchen; Dünn / Knusprig; Spirale / Gedreht; Rad; Sonstige
ko: 프레첼 모양: 볼; 바이트/너겟; 땋은 모양; 매듭; 조각; 프레첼 독; 링; 막대; 소프트 번; 스틱; 씬/크리스프; 트위스트; 휠; 기타
es: Forma del pretzel: Bola; Bocado/nugget; Trenza; Nudo; Pieza; Pretzel dog; Aro; Bastón; Panecillo suave; Palito; Delgado/crujiente; Lazo; Rueda; Otro
lt-LT: Pretzelių forma: Rutuliukas; Gabalėlis / kąsnelis; Kasytė; Mazgas; Gabalėlis; Dešrelė tešloje; Žiedas; Stora lazdelė; Minkšta bandelė; Lazdelė; Plonas / traškus; Suktukas; Ratelis; Kita
ro-RO: Formă de covrig: Bilă; Bucată mică/nugget; Împletitură; Nod; Bucată; Pretzel dog; Inel; Baston; Chiflă moale; Băț; Subțire/crocant; Răsucit; Roată; Altele
el: Σχήμα πρέτσελ: Μπάλα; Μπουκιά/Nugget; Πλεξούδα; Κόμπος; Κομμάτι; Λουκάνικο σε πρέτσελ; Κρίκος; Ραβδάκι; Μαλακό ψωμάκι; Μπαστουνάκι; Λεπτό/Τραγανό; Στριφτό; Ροδέλα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 椒盐脆饼形状: 球状; 一口酥/块状; 辫状; 结状; 片状; 椒盐卷饼热狗; 环状; 棒状; 软面包; 条状; 薄/脆; 扭结状; 轮状; 其他
nl: Pretzel vorm: Bal; Hapje/nugget; Vlecht; Knoop; Stukje; Pretzel-dog; Ring; Staafje; Zacht broodje; Stokje; Dun/krokant; Twist; Wiel; Anders
sk-SK: Tvar praclíka: Gulička; Kúsok/nugeta; Vrkôčik; Uzol; Kúsok; Preclíkový párok; Krúžok; Tyčinka; Mäkká žemľa; Tyčinka; Tenký/chrumkavý; Zatočený; Koliesko; Iný